Hawaii statutes.
§46-48 Deposit of funds in banks.
Chapter 38, relating to the deposit of state moneys in banks, is extended to
the several counties, so that each county and its director of finance and
mayor, respectively, shall have all the rights, powers, obligations and duties
in respect of the moneys of the counties as the State, its director of finance
and governor, respectively, have in respect of the moneys of the State under
chapter 38, provided that nothing in this section contained shall be held to
preclude the director of finance of any county from making special deposits,
with the approval of the council or the mayor, as the case may be, for the
safekeeping of public moneys, other than those deposited in banks under this
section, as provided in sections 62-111 and 70-13. [L 1911, c 156, §1; RL 1925,
§2180; RL 1935, §2317; am L 1935, c 67, §4; RL 1945, §6008; RL 1955, §138-13;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §46-48]

Note

Sections 62-111 and 70-13 referred to in text are repealed.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next